fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX tF Y 42
SFX tF rendre rendre/n'q'd'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tF rendre renant/n'q'd'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tF rendre ris/L'D'Q' prendre
SFX tF rendre rise/L'D'Q' prendre
SFX tF rendre rises/D'Q' prendre
SFX tF rendre rends/j'n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tF rendre rend/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tF rendre renons/n'q'l't' prendre
SFX tF rendre renez/n'q'l'm' prendre
SFX tF rendre rennent/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tF rendre renais/j'n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tF rendre renait/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tF rendre renions/n'q'l't' prendre
SFX tF rendre reniez/n'q'l'm' prendre
SFX tF rendre renaient/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tF rendre ris/j'n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tF rendre rit/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tF rendre rîmes/n'q'l't' prendre
SFX tF rendre rîtes/n'q'l'm' prendre
SFX tF rendre rirent/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tF rendre rendrai/j'n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tF rendre rendras/n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tF rendre rendra/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tF rendre rendrons/n'q'l't' prendre
SFX tF rendre rendrez/n'q'l'm' prendre
SFX tF rendre rendront/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tF rendre rendrais/j'n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tF rendre rendrait/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tF rendre rendrions/n'q'l't' prendre
SFX tF rendre rendriez/n'q'l'm' prendre
SFX tF rendre rendraient/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tF rendre renne/j'n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tF rendre rennes/n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tF rendre risse/j'n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tF rendre risses/n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tF rendre rît/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tF rendre rissions/n'q'l't' prendre
SFX tF rendre rissiez/n'q'l'm' prendre
SFX tF rendre rissent/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tF rendre rends/n'l'm't' prendre
SFX tF rendre renons/n'l't' prendre
SFX tF rendre renez/n'l'm' prendre

SFX tG Y 42
SFX tG prendre prendre/n'q'd'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tG prendre prenant/n'q'd'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tG prendre pris/L'D'Q' prendre
SFX tG prendre prise/L'D'Q' prendre
SFX tG prendre prises/D'Q' prendre
SFX tG prendre prends/j'n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prend/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tG prendre prenons/n'q'l't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prenez/n'q'l'm' prendre
SFX tG prendre prennent/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tG prendre prenais/j'n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prenait/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tG prendre prenions/n'q'l't' prendre
SFX tG prendre preniez/n'q'l'm' prendre
SFX tG prendre prenaient/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tG prendre pris/j'n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prit/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tG prendre prîmes/n'q'l't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prîtes/n'q'l'm' prendre
SFX tG prendre prirent/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tG prendre prendrai/j'n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prendras/n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prendra/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tG prendre prendrons/n'q'l't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prendrez/n'q'l'm' prendre
SFX tG prendre prendront/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tG prendre prendrais/j'n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prendrait/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tG prendre prendrions/n'q'l't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prendriez/n'q'l'm' prendre
SFX tG prendre prendraient/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tG prendre prenne/j'n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tG prendre prennes/n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prisse/j'n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prisses/n'q'l'm't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prît/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tG prendre prissions/n'q'l't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prissiez/n'q'l'm' prendre
SFX tG prendre prissent/n'q'l'm't's' prendre
SFX tG prendre prends/n'l'm't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prenons/n'l't' prendre
SFX tG prendre prenez/n'l'm' prendre

SFX tM Y 32
SFX tM outre outre/n'q'd'l'm't's' foutre
SFX tM outre outant/n'q'd'l'm't's' foutre
SFX tM outre outu/L'D'Q' foutre
SFX tM outre outus/D'Q' foutre
SFX tM outre outue/L'D'Q' foutre
SFX tM outre outues/D'Q' foutre
SFX tM outre ous/j'n'q'l'm't' foutre
SFX tM outre out/n'q'l'm't's' foutre
SFX tM outre outons/n'q'l't' foutre
SFX tM outre outez/n'q'l'm' foutre
SFX tM outre outent/n'q'l'm't's' foutre
SFX tM outre outais/j'n'q'l'm't' foutre
SFX tM outre outait/n'q'l'm't's' foutre
SFX tM outre outions/n'q'l't' foutre
SFX tM outre outiez/n'q'l'm' foutre
SFX tM outre outaient/n'q'l'm't's' foutre
SFX tM outre outrai/j'n'q'l'm't' foutre
SFX tM outre outras/n'q'l'm't' foutre
SFX tM outre outra/n'q'l'm't's' foutre
SFX tM outre outrons/n'q'l't' foutre
SFX tM outre outrez/n'q'l'm' foutre
SFX tM outre outront/n'q'l'm't's' foutre
SFX tM outre outrais/j'n'q'l'm't' foutre
SFX tM outre outrait/n'q'l'm't's' foutre
SFX tM outre outrions/n'q'l't' foutre
SFX tM outre outriez/n'q'l'm' foutre
SFX tM outre outraient/n'q'l'm't's' foutre
SFX tM outre oute/j'n'q'l'm't's' foutre
SFX tM outre outes/n'q'l'm't' foutre
SFX tM outre ous/n'l'm't' foutre
SFX tM outre outons/n'l't' foutre
SFX tM outre outez/n'l'm' foutre

SFX tU Y 5
SFX tU istre istre/n'q'd'l'm't's' tistre
SFX tU istre issu/d'q' tistre
SFX tU istre issus/d'q' tistre
SFX tU istre issue/d'q' tistre
SFX tU istre issues/d'q' tistre

SFX uA Y 46
SFX uA tre tre/n'q'd'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tant/n'q'd'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tu/L'D'Q' tre
SFX uA tre tus/D'Q' tre
SFX uA tre tue/L'D'Q' tre
SFX uA tre tues/D'Q' tre
SFX uA ttre ts/j'n'q'l'm't' ttre
SFX uA ttre t/n'q'l'm't's' ttre
SFX uA tre ts/j'n'q'l'm't' embatre
SFX uA tre t/n'q'l'm't's' embatre
SFX uA tre tons/n'q'l't' tre
SFX uA tre tez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX uA tre tent/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tais/j'n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre tait/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tions/n'q'l't' tre
SFX uA tre tiez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX uA tre taient/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tis/j'n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre tit/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tîmes/n'q'l't' tre
SFX uA tre tîtes/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX uA tre tirent/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre trai/j'n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre tras/n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre tra/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre trons/n'q'l't' tre
SFX uA tre trez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX uA tre tront/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre trais/j'n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre trait/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre trions/n'q'l't' tre
SFX uA tre triez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX uA tre traient/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre te/j'n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tes/n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre tisse/j'n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre tisses/n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre tît/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tissions/n'q'l't' tre
SFX uA tre tissiez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX uA tre tissent/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre s/n'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre ts/n'l'm't' embatre
SFX uA tre tons/n'l't' tre
SFX uA tre tez/n'l'm' tre
