fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.dic
abattre/uA
apprendre/tF
battre/uA
combattre/uA
comprendre/tF
contrebattre/uA
contrefoutre/tM
débattre/uA
déprendre/tG
désapprendre/tF
embatre/uA
embattre/uA
entreprendre/tF
éprendre/tG
foutre/tM
méprendre/tG
prendre/tF
rabattre/uA
rapprendre/tF
réapprendre/tF
rebattre/uA
refoutre/tM
reprendre/tF
soubattre/uA
surprendre/tF
tistre/tU
